Utah statutes.
49-19-301.   Contribution rate -- Annual legislative appropriation.
(1) The Legislature, by means of annual appropriations, shall maintain this
plan on a financially and actuarially sound basis.
(2)  The Legislature shall cause the appropriate amount to be paid to the
office.
